Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-118
Assistance; conditions.

All actions of the Department of Health and Human Services
under the programs authorized by sections 43-117 to 43-117.03
and 43-118.02 shall be subject to the following criteria:

(1) The child so adopted shall have been a child for whom
adoption would not have been possible without the financial aid provided for
by sections 43-117 to 43-117.03 and 43-118.02; and

(2) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
for the administration of sections 43-117 to 43-118 and 43-118.02.

Laws 1971, LB 425, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 1070, § 3;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 117;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 68;

Laws 2012, LB1062, § 3.